Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4201
Legislative intent.

It is the intent and purpose of sections 29-4201 to 29-4207
to authorize the usage of audiovisual court appearances and certain written waivers and pleas in
criminal proceedings consistent with the statutory and constitutional rights
guaranteed by the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of
Nebraska.

Laws 1999, LB 623, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB828, § 1.

This section demonstrates that the Legislature did not intend to allow written arraignments filed under section 29-4206 to supersede Nebraska's criminal procedure statutes. State v. Liston, 271 Neb. 468, 712 N.W.2d 264 (2006).